languages/apertium-tet/apertium-tet.tet.dix
    <pardef n="Timór__np">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="Simão__np">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="Isabel__np">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="Vargas__np">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="cog"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="UNMIT__np">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="org"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>


    <!-- SECTION: Adjectives -->

    <pardef n="boot__adj">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="dahuluk__adj">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="ord"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="portug/és__adj">
      <e><p><l>és</l><r>és<s n="adj"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>esa</l><r>és<s n="adj"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="important/e__adj">
      <e><p><l>e</l><r>e<s n="adj"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>i</l><r>e<s n="adj"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="permanent/i__adj">
      <e><p><l>i</l><r>i<s n="adj"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>e</l><r>i<s n="adj"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="espesializad/u__adj">
      <e><p><l>u</l><r>u<s n="adj"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>o</l><r>u<s n="adj"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>a</l><r>u<s n="adj"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>us</l><r>u<s n="adj"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>as</l><r>u<s n="adj"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="jer/ál__adj">
      <e><p><l>ál</l><r>ál<s n="adj"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ais</l><r>ál<s n="adj"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>


    <!-- SECTION: Adverbs -->

    <pardef n="agora__adv">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="oinsá__adv">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/><s n="itg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="naturalmente__adv">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- SECTION: Verbs -->

    <pardef n="iha__vbhaver">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vbhaver"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="tenke__vbmod">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vbmod"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="solusiona__vblex">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>-an</l><r><s n="vblex"/><j/>an<s n="prn"/><s n="ref"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l><b/>an</l><r><s n="vblex"/><j/>an<s n="prn"/><s n="ref"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>-aan</l><r><s n="vblex"/><j/>an<s n="prn"/><s n="ref"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l><b/>a'an</l><r><s n="vblex"/><j/>an<s n="prn"/><s n="ref"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>-a'an</l><r><s n="vblex"/><j/>an<s n="prn"/><s n="ref"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="sai__vblex">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>-an</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><j/>an<s n="prn"/><s n="ref"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l><b/>an</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><j/>an<s n="prn"/><s n="ref"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>-aan</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><j/>an<s n="prn"/><s n="ref"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l><b/>a'an</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><j/>an<s n="prn"/><s n="ref"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>-a'an</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><j/>an<s n="prn"/><s n="ref"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="hán__vblex">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>-an</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><j/>an<s n="prn"/><s n="ref"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l><b/>an</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><j/>an<s n="prn"/><s n="ref"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>-aan</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><j/>an<s n="prn"/><s n="ref"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l><b/>a'an</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><j/>an<s n="prn"/><s n="ref"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>-a'an</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><j/>an<s n="prn"/><s n="ref"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

  </pardefs>

    <e lm="Indonézia"><i>Indonézia</i><par n="Timór__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Dinamarka"><i>Dinamarka</i><par n="Timór__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Ungria"><i>Ungria</i><par n="Timór__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Libéria"><i>Libéria</i><par n="Timór__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Azerbaijaun"><i>Azerbaijaun</i><par n="Timór__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Laos"><i>Laos</i><par n="Timór__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Jakarta"><i>Jakarta</i><par n="Timór__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Carlos"><i>Carlos</i><par n="Simão__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Armando"><i>Armando</i><par n="Simão__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Fernando"><i>Fernando</i><par n="Simão__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Johannes"><i>Johannes</i><par n="Simão__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Miguel"><i>Miguel</i><par n="Simão__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Mariano"><i>Mariano</i><par n="Simão__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Marcos"><i>Marcos</i><par n="Simão__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Ana"><i>Ana</i><par n="Isabel__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Hillary"><i>Hillary</i><par n="Isabel__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Maria"><i>Maria</i><par n="Isabel__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Lucia"><i>Lucia</i><par n="Isabel__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Gabriela"><i>Gabriela</i><par n="Isabel__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Liliana"><i>Liliana</i><par n="Isabel__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Adalgiza"><i>Adalgiza</i><par n="Isabel__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Leite"><i>Leite</i><par n="Vargas__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Coelho"><i>Coelho</i><par n="Vargas__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Schwartz"><i>Schwartz</i><par n="Vargas__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Rodrigues"><i>Rodrigues</i><par n="Vargas__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Nheu"><i>Nheu</i><par n="Vargas__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Ki-moon"><i>Ki-moon</i><par n="Vargas__np"/></e>
    <e lm="de Sousa"><i>de<b/>Sousa</i><par n="Vargas__np"/></e>
    <e lm="AusAID"><i>AusAID</i><par n="UNMIT__np"/></e>
    <e lm="UNTL"><i>UNTL</i><par n="UNMIT__np"/></e>
    <e lm="OTAN"><i>OTAN</i><par n="UNMIT__np"/></e>
    <e lm="SEFOPE"><i>SEFOPE</i><par n="UNMIT__np"/></e>
    <e lm="UNOTIL"><i>UNOTIL</i><par n="UNMIT__np"/></e>
    <e lm="FALINTIL"><i>FALINTIL</i><par n="UNMIT__np"/></e>
    <e lm="SEKM"><i>SEKM</i><par n="UNMIT__np"/></e>
    <e lm="dahuluk" r="LR"><p><l>da-uluik</l><r>dahuluk</r></p><par n="dahuluk__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="pertama"><i>pertama</i><par n="dahuluk__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="segundu"><i>segundu</i><par n="dahuluk__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="terseiru"><i>terseiru</i><par n="dahuluk__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="kuartu"><i>kuartu</i><par n="dahuluk__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="kelima"><i>kelima</i><par n="dahuluk__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="dalimak"><i>dalimak</i><par n="dahuluk__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ladi'ak"><i>ladi'ak</i><par n="boot__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="importante"><i>important</i><par n="important/e__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="independente"><i>independent</i><par n="important/e__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="protestante"><i>protestant</i><par n="important/e__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="permanenti"><i>permanent</i><par n="permanent/i__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="inosenti"><i>inosent</i><par n="permanent/i__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="matenek"><i>matenek</i><par n="boot__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="modok"><i>modok</i><par n="boot__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="estável"><i>estável</i><par n="boot__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ki'ikoan"><i>ki'ikoan</i><par n="boot__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="lós" r="LR"><p><l>loos</l><r>lós</r></p><par n="boot__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="emprezariál"><i>emprezari</i><par n="jer/ál__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="fundamentál"><i>fundament</i><par n="jer/ál__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="interministeriál"><i>interministeri</i><par n="jer/ál__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="konstituisionál"><i>konstituision</i><par n="jer/ál__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ofisiál"><i>ofisi</i><par n="jer/ál__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="politikál"><i>politik</i><par n="jer/ál__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="koñesidu"><i>koñesid</i><par n="espesializad/u__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="dignu"><i>dign</i><par n="espesializad/u__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="estranjeiru"><i>estranjeir</i><par n="espesializad/u__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="espesífiku"><i>espesífik</i><par n="espesializad/u__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="marsiál"><i>marsi</i><par n="jer/ál__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="aprosimadu"><i>aprosimad</i><par n="espesializad/u__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="eskritu"><i>eskrit</i><par n="espesializad/u__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="superiór"><i>superiór</i><par n="boot__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="portugés" r="LR"><p><l>portugu</l><r>portug</r></p><par n="portug/és__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="inglés"><i>ingl</i><par n="portug/és__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="fransés"><i>frans</i><par n="portug/és__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="olandés"><i>oland</i><par n="portug/és__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="aragonés"><i>aragon</i><par n="portug/és__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="noruegés"><i>norueg</i><par n="portug/és__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="tailandés"><i>tailand</i><par n="portug/és__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="penitensiáriu"><i>penitensiári</i><par n="espesializad/u__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="oinsá"><i>oinsá</i><par n="oinsá__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="oinsá" r="LR"><p><l>oin<b/>sá</l><r>oinsá</r></p><par n="oinsá__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="nusá"><i>nusá</i><par n="oinsá__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="tansá"><i>tansá</i><par n="oinsá__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="hori-bain-hira"><i>hori-bain-hira</i><par n="oinsá__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="tanba sá" r="LR"><p><l>tamba<b/>sá</l><r>tanba<b/>sá</r></p><par n="oinsá__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="tanba sá" r="LR"><p><l>tanbasá</l><r>tanba<b/>sá</r></p><par n="oinsá__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="baibain" r="LR"><p><l>bain-bain</l><r>baibain</r></p><par n="agora__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="kotuk"><i>kotuk</i><par n="agora__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="nune'e" r="LR"><p><l>nune</l><r>nune'e</r></p><par n="agora__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="de'it" r="LR"><p><l>dei't</l><r>de'it</r></p><par n="agora__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="fali"><i>fali</i><par n="agora__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="fou-foun" r="LR"><p><l>foufoun</l><r>fou-foun</r></p><par n="agora__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="kalan-kalan"><i>kalan-kalan</i><par n="agora__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="atualmente"><i>atualmente</i><par n="naturalmente__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="diretamente" r="LR"><p><l>direitamente</l><r>diretamente</r></p><par n="naturalmente__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="lokalmente"><i>lokalmente</i><par n="naturalmente__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="orijinalmente"><i>orijinalmente</i><par n="naturalmente__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="progressivamente"><i>progressivamente</i><par n="naturalmente__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="teknikamente"><i>teknikamente</i><par n="naturalmente__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ho didiak"><i>ho<b/>didiak</i><par n="naturalmente__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="laiha" r="LR"><p><l>laiha</l><r>la<s n="adv"/><j/>iha</r></p><par n="iha__vbhaver"/></e>
    <e lm="iha"><i>iha</i><par n="iha__vbhaver"/></e>
    <e lm="tenke"><i>tenke</i><par n="tenke__vbmod"/></e>
    <e lm="tenke" r="LR"><p><l>tenki</l><r>tenke</r></p><par n="tenke__vbmod"/></e>
    <e lm="tenke" r="LR"><p><l>tengki</l><r>tenke</r></p><par n="tenke__vbmod"/></e>
    <e lm="bele"><i>bele</i><par n="tenke__vbmod"/></e>
    <e lm="labele" r="LR"><p><l>labele</l><r>la<s n="adv"/><j/>bele</r></p><par n="tenke__vbmod"/></e>
    <e lm="to'o"><i>to'o</i><par n="sai__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ahi hán"><i>ahi<b/>hán</i><par n="sai__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="mosu"><i>mosu</i><par n="sai__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="haka'as"><i>haka'as</i><par n="sai__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="refleta"><i>refleta</i><par n="sai__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="avansa"><i>avansa</i><par n="sai__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="aprende"><i>aprende</i><par n="hán__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="hirus"><i>hirus</i><par n="hán__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="halót"><i>halót</i><par n="hán__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="identifika"><i>identifika</i><par n="hán__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="kria"><i>kria</i><par n="hán__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="klika" r="LR"><p><l>klika</l><r>klik</r></p><par n="hán__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="atua"><i>atua</i><par n="solusiona__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="emite"><i>emite</i><par n="solusiona__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="hakat"><i>hakat</i><par n="solusiona__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="jere"><i>jere</i><par n="solusiona__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="nomeia"><i>nomeia</i><par n="solusiona__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="suporta"><i>suporta</i><par n="solusiona__vblex"/></e>
